North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-03.1 Uniform Controlled Substances Act

19-03.1-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter and in chapters 19-03.2 and 19-03.4, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administer” means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:

A practitioner or, in the practitioner’s presence, by the practitioner’s authorized agent; or

The patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.

“Agent” means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseman, or employee of the carrier or warehouseman.

“Anabolic steroids” means any drug or hormonal substance, chemically and pharmacologically related to testosterone, other than estrogens, progestins, and corticosteroids.

“Board” means the state board of pharmacy.

“Bureau” means the drug enforcement administration in the United States department of justice or its successor agency.

“Controlled substance” means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor in schedules I through V as set out in this chapter.

“Controlled substance analog”:

Means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in a schedule I or II and:

Which has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system which is substantially similar to or greater than the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance in schedule I or II; or

With respect to a particular individual, which the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to or greater than the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance in schedule I or II.

Does not include:

A controlled substance;

Any substance for which there is an approved new drug application; or

With respect to a particular individual, any substance, if an exemption is in effect for investigational use, for that individual, under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 355] to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption.

“Counterfeit substance” means a controlled substance which, or the container or labeling of which, without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number or device, or any likeness thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other than the person who in fact manufactured, distributed, or dispensed the substance.

“Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person to another of a controlled substance whether or not there is an agency relationship.

“Dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate user or research subject by or pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the prescribing, administering, packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery.

“Dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses.

“Distribute” means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.

“Distributor” means a person who distributes.

“Drug” means:

Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States pharmacopeia national formulary, or the official homeopathic pharmacopeia of the United States, or any supplement to any of them;

Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals;

Substances, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and

Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in subdivision a, b, or c. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

“Immediate precursor” means a substance:

That the board has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used or produced primarily for use in the manufacture of a controlled substance;

That is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of the controlled substance; and

The control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.

“Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation or compounding of a controlled substance by an individual for the individual’s own use or the preparation, compounding, packaging, or labeling of a controlled substance:

By a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner’s administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner’s professional practice; or

By a practitioner, or by the practitioner’s authorized agent under the practitioner’s supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

“Marijuana” means all parts of the plant of the genus cannabis, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant. The term does not include:

The tetrahydrocannabinol extracted or isolated from the plant;

The mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination;

Hemp as defined in chapter 4.1-18.1; or

A prescription drug approved by the United States food and drug administration under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 355].

“Narcotic drug” means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

Opium and opiate and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate.

Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in subdivision a, but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

Opium poppy and poppy straw.

Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves, any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these substances, but not including decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca leaves which do not contain cocaine or ecgonine.

“Opiate” means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under section 19-03.1-02, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes its racemic and levorotatory forms.

“Opium poppy” means the plant of the species papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.

“Over-the-counter sale” means a retail sale of a drug or product other than a controlled, or imitation controlled, substance.

“Person” means individual, corporation, limited liability company, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal entity.

“Poppy straw” means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.

“Practitioner” means:

A physician, dentist, veterinarian, pharmacist, scientific investigator, or other person licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted by the jurisdiction in which the individual is practicing to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to, or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research.

A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to, or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.

“Production” includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

“Sale” includes barter, exchange, or gift, or offer therefor, and each such transaction made by a person, whether as principal, proprietor, agent, servant, or employee.

“Scheduled listed chemical product” means a product that contains ephedrine, pseudoephedrin, or phenylpropanolamine, or each of the salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers of each chemical, and that may be marketed or distributed in the United States under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 301 et seq.] as a nonprescription drug unless prescribed by a licensed physician.

“State” when applied to a part of the United States includes any state, district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession thereof, and any area subject to the legal authority of the United States.

“Ultimate user” means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual’s own use or for the use of a member of the individual’s household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual’s household.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 1; 1977, ch. 194, § 1; 1979, ch. 287, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 262, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 223, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 217, § 1; 2001, ch. 213, § 3; 2003, ch. 181, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 207, § 1; 2013, ch. 183, § 4; 2019, ch. 185, § 1, effective April 9, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 1, effective May 3, 2021; 2021, ch. 172, § 1, effective April 16, 2021.

Note.

Section 19-03.1-01 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 173, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2059; and Section 1 of Chapter 172, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1213.

Cross-References.

Ex parte order for wiretapping and eavesdropping upon probable cause of felony violation under this chapter, see

N.D.C.C. § 29-29.2-02.

19-03.1-01.1.
Board — Agreements — Gifts.

In carrying out its duties under this chapter, the board shall consult with representatives of each of the following interests: North Dakota board of medicine, board of dental examiners, board of registry in podiatry, board of veterinary medical examiners, board of nursing, the college of pharmacy, and the school of medicine.

To carry out its duties under this chapter, the board may enter into agreements or memorandums of understanding with the interests named in subsection 1. Additionally, the board may contract for and accept private contributions, gifts, and grants-in-aid from the federal government, private industry, and other sources. The income received from these sources must be spent for the purpose designated in the gift, grant, or donation.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 262, § 3; 1987, ch. 263, § 10; 1993, ch. 218, § 2; 1993, ch. 220, § 1; 1995, ch. 217, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2015, ch. 297, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 297, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

19-03.1-02.
Authority to control.

The board shall administer this chapter and may add substances to or delete or reschedule all substances enumerated in the schedules in sections 19-03.1-05, 19-03.1-07, 19-03.1-09, 19-03.1-11, or 19-03.1-13 pursuant to the procedures of chapter 28-32. In making a determination regarding a substance, the board shall consider the following:

The actual or relative potential for abuse;

The scientific evidence of its pharmacological effect, if known;

The state of current scientific knowledge regarding the substance;

The history and current pattern of abuse;

The scope, duration, and significance of abuse;

The risk to the public health;

The potential of the substance to produce psychic or physiological dependence liability; and

Whether the substance is an immediate precursor of a substance already controlled under this chapter.

After considering the factors enumerated in subsection 1, the board shall make findings with respect thereto and issue a rule controlling the substance if it finds the substance has a potential for abuse.

If the board designates a substance as an immediate precursor, substances which are precursors of the controlled precursor are not subject to control solely because they are precursors of the controlled precursor.

If any substance is designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a controlled substance under federal law and notice thereof is given to the board, the board shall similarly control the substance under this chapter after the expiration of thirty days from publication in the federal register of a final order designating a substance as a controlled substance or rescheduling, or deleting a substance, unless within that thirty-day period, the board objects to inclusion, rescheduling, or deletion. In that case, the board shall publish the reasons for objection and afford all interested parties an opportunity to be heard. At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall publish its decision, which is final unless altered by statute. Upon publication of objection to inclusion, rescheduling, or deletion under this chapter by the board, control under this chapter is stayed until the board publishes its decision.

Authority to control under this section does not extend to distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco as those terms are defined or used in title 5.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 2; 1985, ch. 262, § 4.

19-03.1-03.
Nomenclature.

The controlled substances listed or to be listed in the schedules in sections 19-03.1-05, 19-03.1-07, 19-03.1-09, 19-03.1-11, and 19-03.1-13 are included by whatever official, common, usual, chemical, or trade name designated.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 3.

19-03.1-04.
Schedule I tests.

The board shall place a substance in schedule I if it finds that the substance:

Has high potential for abuse; and

Has no accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or lacks accepted safety for use in treatment under medical supervision.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 4; 1985, ch. 262, § 5.

Collateral References.

Defense of necessity, duress, or coercion in prosecution for violation of state narcotics law, 1 A.L.R.5th 938.

Availability of Defense of Duress or Coercion in Prosecution for Violation of Federal Narcotics Laws,. 71 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 481.

Law Reviews.

Up in Smoke: The Medicinal Marijuana Debate, 75 N.D. L. Rev. 555 (1999).